hytex/sme-texhyph.dic
.ab1
.ad1
.ak1
.an1
.ang1
.ani1
.ap1
.ap2r
.ara1
.ar1t
.ase1
.at2r
.au2
.áde1
.ále1
.bad1
.bá1b
.be1t
.bod1
.coo1
.ča1b
.čad1
.ča1n
.dad1
.dah2
.dan1
.da2s
.dá1ž
.dek1
.des1
.dub1
.dud1
.ebe2
.eks1
.el1
.emo1
.ere1
.evo1
.fad1
.fal1
.fád1
.fi2e
.gad1
.ga1ž
.ged1
.gid1
.gud1
.hal1
.hat1
.ii1l
.ino1
.in1s
.int1
.ipo1
.ire1
.iso1
.jab1
.jád1
.jás1
.job1
.kao1
.kar1
.kas1
.ke1l
.klá1
.ko1d
.lad1
.lan1
.lál1
.lid1
.lod1
.lol1
.mad1
.mag1
.mak1
.mák1
.ne1b
.net1
.nol1
.no2s
.nu1d
.oba1
.ola1
.ona1
.opa1
.ose1
.pa1k
.pas1
.pás1
.pio1
.pi1r
.pol1
.rad1
.rád1
.re1b
.rem1
.res1
.reu1
.rid1
.ril1
.rod1
.rud1
.rul1
.sed1
.sif1
.si1o
.sod1
.sop1
.so1s
.st2
.sud1
.sup1
.syk1
.šad1
.tas1
.ta1t
.tek1
.tv1
.ui1d
.uri1
.uvl1
.vad1
.vád1
.vid1
a1a
a1á
aái1
abbá2
a2bu
2ac
acci1
aceš1
ačče1
a2da
adá1ž
a2de.
a1dem
a1des
a2det
a2dii
a2din
ad2o
a1du
adu1m
a2duv
1adv
ađe2
a1e
aeas1
ae1d
a2el
a2es
aesk2
a2et
a1f
afá1r
affi1
afi1k
a2fr
a1g
a2gan
a2gav
agás1
a2geb
a2ged
a2geš
a2get
1agi.
a2gin
agir1
ag2no
a2g1r
a2gut
a2guv
a1ha.
a1hač
a1had
a1hal1
a2hem
a2hi
ahká2
ah1l
ahto1
ahu1m
2a2i
ai1b2
ai2d
a1ii
ai1le
a1ism
aito1
a1j
ajes1
ajje2
aka1
a2ke
ake2m
akes1
2a1ko
akon1
ak1r
aku1m
akva1
a1l
alai1
a2lam
a2lao
a2lat
alá2m
1alár
alás2
al2de
al2di
a2le
1alf
a2lii
ali2m
alin1
a2liv
alsi1
alu1m
a1m
a2ma.
a2mam
ambu1
ame1d
ame1l
amii1
a2mu
amy1
ance2
anda1
andá1
andi1
a1ne.
anil1
an1j
an2je
anna2
a2no
1anog
an1os
an1sk
anso1
an1st
a1o
ao2a
aois2
ao1s
a1p
aper2
a2pr
ap2re
ap2s
a1ra
ara1b
ara2h
a1rá
ará1d
ar2d
a2re
ares1
arne1
a1ro2
arpe1
asár1
as1át
asci1
as1ek
ase1l
ase1s
a2si
a2sk
a1sko
asmo1
as2mu
a2so
aso1s
as2t
astá2
a1str
asu2
asub1
asui1
a2ša
aš1áh
a1šis
a1šoh
aš2t
a2šuh
a2šum
a2šus
at1ál
atá1n
ate1g
atek1
at1h
atni2
a2to
atta2
attá2
au1b
au1d
a1ul
a2u1m
au1n
aust1
aušu1
a1uv
ava1r
avje1
avt1
ax1
a1y2
a1z
azai1
azze1
a2žat
a2že
a2ži
ažže1
ábai1
á2bu
á1ded
á1deh
á2det
á2di
ád2r
á1du
á2duh
á2dut
á2duv
áđe2
áđve1
á1e
á1f
áfai1
áfá2
áfe2
á2fr
áfrá2
á1ga
ágai1
ágas1
á1hag
á2ham
á2he
á1hu
áibi1
1ái1b2m
á2id
áid2n
ái2do
ái2du
áipa1
áira2
áisa2
áiva1
á1j
á2je
áj1i
á2ju
á2k
áka1t
ákka2
ák1r
1ákš
á1lá
1álb
ál2da
á2lea
á1li
álle1
álo2n
álpa1
ál2s
álu2m
á1lus
álva1
2ám
á2me.
á2mea
á2met
ámi2
ámit2
ámot2
ámpá1
á2mu
á1na
ánar1
ánd2o
á1ne
áne1b
áne1j
áne2l
áne2m
án2g
á2nis
án1j
ánse2
á2nu
áŋi1
1áŋko
á1o
ápme1
á1ra
árai1
ára2l
á1rá
árdu1
áre1h
árga2
á2ris
árre1
á2s
ása2l
ásár1
ás1h
ási2
ási1h
ásis2
áska2
ás1ko
ás1om
ás2t
ás1uv
áš2go
ášo2
ášsi1
áštu1
á2šu
át1
2át.
á2to
2átt
á1ŧ
áva2š
ávár1
ávás2
á1vi
ávri1
ávva2
áze1
á2zo2
ážos1
1b2a
ba2de
ba2du
ba2h
ba2m
ba2n
ba2r
ba2s
bas1h
ba2š
ba1ž
1bá
bádu1
bá2h
bá2ji
bá2m
bá2ri
bá2š
2b1b
bbá2n
bbá2r
bbes2
bble2
b2boa
bb2r
bbu2
2b1d2
1be
2beah
be1b
2beč
be2gi
2beh
beju1
be1li
be2ma
ber1t
bfi1
b1g
1b2i
bi2d
bi2me
bio1
bi1oh
bi2s
bis2t
biva1
biža1
b1j
2b1l2
bla1s
b2lá
b1m2
b2man
bmes2
bmil2
bmo2
bmo1a
1b2o2
boar1
bok1
bow1
2b1r
brat2
brii1
bri1k
b1s2
bs1t2
bsti1
bsur1
1bu
bu2b
2buč
b2ur
b2us
bu1st
2buš
buvi1
2buž
b1v
1by
by2s
2b'
1ca
ca2d
ca2gi
ca2go
ca2h
ca2l
ca2m
ca2n
ca2se
ca2š
1cá
cá1ha
cá2j
cá2l
cá2n
cás2
cá1z
c1b
2c1c
cd1a
cd1o
1c2e
ce1b
ce1d
ce2di
cei1
ce1le
ce2ma
2c1g
2c1h
c2ha
char1
ch1l
1c2i
ci2d
ci1n
ci2s
cis2t
ci2to
ci2v
2c1k
ck2v
ckvi1
c1m
1c2o
2coa
co2ba
co2d
codi1
cogá1
co2l
co2m
come1
core2
co2s
cosi1
cot2t
c2s2
csai1
c1t
cty1
1cu
cu2l
cu2m
c1v
1cy
cyk1
1ča
ča2ga
ča2gu
ča2h
ča2li
ča2me
čamu1
ča1na
ča2ni
ča2s
čava1
1čá
čá2l
čá1lu
čá2m
čá2ni
čá2r
2č1č
1če
čeal1
če1b
če2ma
če1še
če2šu
1či2
čil1d
čis2t
1č2o
čoa1n
čo2d
čo2l
čo2n
čo2ri
čo2sk
čovl1
1ču
ču2go
čui1k
čujo1
ču2m
1da
da2d
2dadd
da2gi
d2a2h
daid1
da1is
dalu1
d2am
da2me
2damo
2dan
da2ni
dan1o
d2ap
da2r
d2as
da2se
d2at
1d2á
dá2d
dádu1
dá2m
dá2ra
2d1b
d1č
2d1d2
dda2
ddá2l
dde1b
dde2m
ddi2
d2dir
d2doa
ddu1m
d2e
2dea
1deaj
dean1
2debb
1debe
de2d
defi1
1deha
1dehu
2dei
1deik
1dek
1de2l
1dema
1demu
1den
1deo
2dep
1der
derá1
de2ru1
de2s
1desk
1dešt
1detb
2detn
de1t2r
2dett
1dev
1deža
1deže
1deži
2d1g
dhá1
d1ho
1di
d2ia
di2d2
di2mi
di1od
dio2n
dip1
di2si
dis2t
2diš
2div
diva1
d1j
dja2
djis2
djo2m
djo2n
dju2
d1k
d1l
2d1m
dmi1
d1n2
d2na
1dna.
1dnad
1dnag
1dnao
2dná2
dne2m
d2ni
dno2
dno1h
d2nug
d2nul
1do2
2doe
d2oi
d2ok
2d1olg
d2on
d1org
dot2t
2d1p2
dpo1
dpro1
2d1r2
drai1
drat2
d2res
d1s2
d1š
2dt2
d2u
1du.
1dub
1duc
1dud
1dug
duga1
du2go
1duh
1dui
1duk
du2mu
1dun
1duo
2dup
1dur
1dusa
1dusb
1duse
1dusi
1dusj
1dusk
1dusm
1duss
1dust
1dusv
1duš
1duva
1duvu
2d1v
dvo1
dy2s
dyt2
1đ2a2
đamu1
đaža1
1đ2á2
đása1
2đb
đba2d
đ1b2m
2đ1đ
1đe
đe2m
đes2t
2đ1g
đga2
đge1j
đg2ŋ
1đi2
đi1hi
2đj
đ1je
đje1j
đ1ji
đ1jo
đ1ju
2đm
2đŋ
1đo2
đogá1
1đu2
2đv
đ1vi
đvu2
e2a
ead1
eaju1
eak1
eal1d
ea1na
eane1
e1ano
ea1šo
e1atu
e1á
e2ba
e2be
e2bm
ebos1
2e1c1
ecce2
ech1
e1č
e2da
eda1š
e2de.
ede2g
e2det
edis1
e2dj
ed2o
edov1
edu1m
edur1
2eđ
eđge1
e1e
eepe2
ee1s
e1fe1
e2ga
egir1
e1g2n
ego2i1
e1g2r
2e2h
ehá1
eheš1
ehká2
ehu1m
ei1b2m
e2id
eid2n
e1ie
e1ii
ei1le
e2im
ei1r
eis2k
e1ja
e2jin
ejjo1
e1jo
eju1d
e1jug
2e2k
ekai1
eka1n
eká1
ekko2
ekno1
e1ko
eko1d
ekor1
eksa1
e2la
ela2l
elaš1
e1lá
e2le.
e2l1ek
e2lep
eleš1
ele1ž
elio1
e2lis
el1n
elo2l
e1m
emát2
e2me
e2min
e2mo
empo2
e2mu
e1n
2ena
ene1l
e2nis
e2n1j
2enn
e2no
en1os
en1sk
en1st
enta1
entá1
entu1
e1o2
eodá1
eo1p2
eosk2
eot2
2ep
epi1k
ep2o
eppá1
e1p2r
epre1
epro1
e1r
er1ak
e2ran
e2r1ár
2erb
2erc
er1dr
e2rep
ergo1
e2ris
e2riv
erká1
erko2
erku1
erlá1
2ero
ero1n
eroš1
2erp
2ert
2eru
2erv
erva1
e2sab
e2se
ese1b
ese1d
e2sf
es2h
es1il1
es1in
e2sis
eska1
e1s2ká
es1ko
e2so
es1ok
es1or
e1sp
essa1
e1s2tá
e1str
e2š1á
eš2g
eš1l
eš1o
eš2ta
eš2te
eš2ti
etá1š
e2t1áv
et1h
1etni
e2to
1etu
e1um.
e1uma
e1ume
e1umm
eut1
2ev
evh1
e2viđ
exis1
e1y2
eys2
eyt2
eža1d
e1žag
e2že
e2ži
e1ä
é1a2
éask2
éat2
é1l
1f2a2
famu1
fa1su
fa1ši
1f2á
fá2h
fá2j
fá1m
fá2me
fá2ra
fá2ri
fá1ši
fávl1
f2e
fe1b
fe1d
fe1in
feno1
fer1t
2f1f2
ffá2l
ffe1i
ffi1s
ffo2
ffu1l
1f2i
fia2n
fi2d
fi1e
fi2le
fi2me
fi1n
finj1
fi1o1
fi2r
fi2sk
fis1p
fis2t
f1l
1f2la
f2lo
1f2o
fo2d
foku1
fo2s
foto1
f1r
fra1s
f2re
f2ru
2f1t
fta1
1f2u
fu2m
fy1m
1ga
ga2ba
1gac
ga2du
ga2ga
ga2go
1ga2h
1gal
ga2li
ga2m
2gamo
gamu1
ga2n
gani1
ga2r
g2a2s
gas1h
1gasv
1ga2šá
gaše1
1gašu
1gati
gat2t
2gažž
1gá
gád2
gá2h
gái1d
gá2l
gá2m
gá2n
gáv1s
2g1b
2g1d
gda2
1ge
2geam
2geas
2geat
gea1ž
ge1b
ge2d
2gei
ge2l
ge2ma
gen1o
gen1s
2gep
ge2ra
gerá1
geta1
ge1u
2g1g2
gga2l
gga2š
ggá2
ggu2l
ggu2m
2g1h
1gi
gi2ba
gi2d
gie1
gi2l
gi2m
gina1
gi1nj
gi2ra
gi2s
gis2t
2giš
giti1
gi2vi
g1j
2g1k
2g1l2
glá1
g2lás
gle1
g2lo1
g2ly
2g1m
2g1n
gna1
2g1ŋ
g2o
1go.
1goab
1goal
1goar
1goas
1goaz
1go2b
1go2d
1goha
go1i
1go2j
1gok
1go2l
1go2m
1gon
1gor
1gos
1goš
1got
1gov
1gož
1gram
1grá
grá1d
g2rám
g2re
gril1
2g1ro
gro1i
2g1s
gs2k
g2su
2gš2
2g1t
1gu
gu2g
gulá1
2g1v
2g'
1habl
had1
1ha2h
hahr1
2haht
hai1
1hal.
1ha2me1
ha2n
1hann
1hanš
har1t
1has
ha2se
1hašt
1hatb
1hatc
1hatč
1hatd
1hatg
1hato
1hav
hava1
1haw
1haži
1há
háli1
há2ma
háse2
há1še
há1ši
h1b2
hca2b
hcá2
hccá2
hci2l
hča2
hča2l
hčás1
h1d2
1he
2heab
2heb1
he1de
hege1
hehe1
he2i
hemo1
2heo
2hep
heš1t
2het
2hež
2h1g
2h1h
1hib
1hik
1hil
hil1d
hi2me
1hine
1hing
hio2
1hisb
1hisv
2hiv
hivl1
h1j
2hk
hká2n
h1ko2
hku1l
hku1m
2hl
hla2
h1lá2
h1le
h1li
hlla2
h1lu
2hm
2h2n
h1ne
hno2n
h2o
1hoš
hou1
2h1p
hpi2
hpi1h
h1ra
h1rá
2h1s
2h1t
hta2g
htá1d
htá2l
htás1
hte1g
hte2r
htto2
h2u
2huh
1hui
1huk
hul1
hu1na
hu1ne
1huo
huol1
hu2p
hur2
1husa
1husg
1husm
1huss
1huš
2hut
1hutt
1huu
2huv
huvl1
2h1v
1hy
hya1
2hæ
2h'
i1a1
iag2
ia2h
ia2m
ia2na
iap2
ia2s
iask2
iat2t
i1á
iána1
iára1
i2ba.
ibbe1
ibi1l
ica2
icco1
ice2n
ic2k1
icu1
ida2l
i2dat
idá2
i1de
i2ded
i2deh
i2dež
i2di
1i2dj
i1dn
i2doa
i1du
i2duh
iđai1
i1ea
i2ed1
i2eg
iega1
ie1go
i2el
ielo1
ie1lu
i1em
iená1
ie2ni
i1era
ierá2
i2erg
i2erk
iero1
i2es
iese1
ie2sk
ie2š1
ievl1
ie1ž
i1f
i2fl
i2fr
2i1g
i2gač
iga2l
i2g1ar
i2gaž
igái1
i2ge.
i2go
igro1
i2h
i1haž
ihca1
ihne1
ihu1m
2ii
ii1b2m
i2id
iid2n
ii2do
ii2du
ii1h
i2ij
ii1le2
iisa1
iis2t
iite1
i1j
ija1b
ije2
2ik
ika1n
iká1l
ikcu1
i2ke
ike1l
iklá1
i1ko
iko2l
iko2m
iko1s
ik1r
ik2ri
ikro1
iksu1
ikti2
iku2m
ikvi1
2ila
ila2l
ila2r
i1lá2
il2da
il2du
i1li
i2liš
ilo1s
i1lu
i1m
i2ma.
imá1h
imás1
immu1
i2mu1
2i2n
in1ak
i1naš
ind2r
in1es
1inf
in1j
inso1
2io
io1d
i1oht
i2oi2
i1ok
iona1
ioná1
io1p2
i1or
i1o1s
io1š
iot2
i1ov
ip1l
ipo1d
ipos1
ipu2
i1ra
i2ran
i1rá
irá1l
ir2d
i2re
i2ri
i1ro
iro2d
i2rut
i2sa
is1ar
isat2
ise2n
i2set
is1h
isid1
isi1k
i2sin
isip1
iska2
is1ko2
i2sp
isso2
is2te
is2tu
i1su
išai1
i1še
iš1lá
i1šo
2it
itá1l
itc1
it1h
it2le
itno1
ito2m
ito1s
itu2b
i1u
iu1m
2iv
iva2l
ive1a
ive2n
i1vi
i2viđ
ivu2
i1z
izai1
i1ža
i1že
ižeš1
i1ži
1ja2d
jađ1
ja2go
ja2h
ja2l
1jalg
ja2me
ja2mo
jana1
ja2ni
1janl
ja2s
ja2š
ja2t1
1já
já2da
já2ji
já2l
já2m
já2n
járe1
já1z
jeas1
je1b
jeba1
je2di
1jek
1jera
1jest
1jevu
ji2ba
j2i2d1
ji2e
1jieŋ
ji2g
j2ii
1jik
jilo2
ji2me
ji1o
ji2se
ji2si
jiso2
2j1j
jja1k
jjás1
jješ1
jji2
jjis2
j2o
jo2d
2joi
jo2l
jo2ma
jona1
1jor.
jord1
1jori
jos2
1josk
jou1l
2j1s
jsi2
1jud1
jugá1
ju2go
1juh
jui1
1jul
ju1m
ju1nj
1junk
juos1
1juvl
2j1v
2j'
1k2a
kabi1
2kač
ka2d
ka2ga
ka2go
ka2h
kaku1
ka2ma
ka2me
kamo1
2kand
ka2ni
ka2r
kará1
kar1t
ka2s
kas1h
kask2
kato1
kat2t
1k2á
ká2d
ká2h
ká2j
ká2m
kámu1
2k1áŋ
ká2r
ká1su
ká2š
2k1b
k1c
kca2
kcá2
k1č
kča2
kčo2
1k2e
ke1b
ke2d
ke2li
ke2ma
ke2ra
ke2s
kes2t
1ké
2k1f2
2k1g
k1h
1k2i
ki2ba
ki2bu
ki2da
ki2de
ki2du
ki2l
kil2d
ki2ma
ki2me
ki2s
kis2t
kje1
2k1k2
kká2l
kká2n
kko2l
kko2n
kkor1
kkre1
kku1b
kku1m
kkvi1
1k2l2
kla1r
k1le
k1li
klos1
2k1m
2k1n
kna1
knál1
k1ŋ
k2o
ko1ag
koai1
ko1an
1kob
1kod
kogá1
ko2h
1kok
1ko2la
kolá1
1kolo
1kom
ko2mo
komp1
1kon
ko1n2j
1koo
2kop
1ko2r
kor1d
kor1t
1kos
kosi1
1koš
1kot
1kovi
1kož
2kr
kra1
kro1s
2k1s
ksa2b
kse2n
ks2f
ks2h
ksha1
ksi2s
ksit2
ks2j
k2sk
ks2ko
ks2ku
ks2o
kso2l
kso2m
k2s1p
ks2pi1
ks2t2
ksu1m
ksy1
2k1š
kša2
kše2
kšes1
2k1t
kta1b
kta1r
ktá2j
ktá2l
kto2b
kto2m
kto2n
1ku
ku2go
kulo1
kuos1
ku1p
kur1d
k1v
kvar1
kvi1r
2kvu
k1w
1ky
1l2a
2lab
la2ba
la2d
2ladd
lagi1
la2go
la2h
la2li
la2me
lamu1
la2n
la2ra
la2se
latá1
lau1
l2á
1lád
1lág
lági1
1láh
lá1ha
1lái
lá2ji
1lák
1lá2l
lá2me
1lámp
1lá2r
1lás.
1láse
1lási
1lást
1láš
1láv
2l1b2
lba1
lbe1
2l1c
lci1
2lč
lča2
lčča2
lčče2
2ld
l2dal
l2dam
ldá2
l1de
ldi1r
l2dit
l1dn
ldna2
ld2o
l1du
l2duh
l2dut
l2e
1lead
1leah
leai1
1lean
1lear
1lebe
2led
1lede
1le2di
1lef
1leg
lega1
1leh
le1ha
2lei
le1j
le2je
le2ju
1lek
1le1l
le2li
1len
1leo
1ler
le2ra
1les
le2sa
1le2š
leu2
1lev
levl1
1lex
1lež
2ležž
1lé
2l1f
2lg
l1ga
lgen1
l1g2ŋ
l1go2
2l1h
l2i
1li.
li2d
1lie
li1er
lies2
1lih
1liij
lii1l
1lik
li2la
1lime
2lin
lina1
1linm
1lio
li2ov
1lipt
lir1
1lise
1lism
2lit
lita1
1liu
li2vi
1livu
2l1j
l2ji
2l1k
lka2
l2kl
lko2
2l1l
lla2m
lla2r
lla2s
llá2b
lle2n
lli2k
ll2j
llo2b
llo2l
llo2m
llu2b
2lm
lmu1
l2muh
2ln
l1ne
l1nj
2lŋ
1lo
2loa
lo1at
lobu1
lo2da
l2og
l2oh
l2oi
lo2la
lo2li
l2om
lo2mo
l2on
l2oo
lora2
lorá1
losi1
los2s
l2ot
l2ov
2lp
lpor1
l1r
2ls
lsi1k
l1s2k
ls2t
l1sta
l1su
2lš
lša1
l1še
l1ši
l1šo
2l1t
ltte1
2lu
lude1
lu2go
1lui
lu2l
1l2um
lumu1
1luo
l2us
1luš
1lutk
1luv
l1uvn
2l1v
lvi1
lvva2
1ly
2lž
l1ža
l1že
l1ži
1lä
l1ø
lå1
2l'
1ma2
ma1is
2mamo
mao1i
mask2
ma1ši
1má2
máka1
mámu1
mášu1
mávr1
2m1b
mba2
mbai1
mbi2b
mb2l
mb2ri
2mc2
2m1č
m1d2
1me
meai1
2meap
me2b
medi1
me1ga
meju1
meka1
me2ma
mena1
2mep
me1su
meto1
me2ž
2m1f
mfit2
2m1g
m1h
1mi
m1i2a2
mi2b
mi1d2
miká1
mi2l
milo1
mi2me
mina1
mirá1
misi1
misk2
mis2t
mi2vi
2m1k
2m1l
2m1m2
mmo2d
mmo2r
mmu1n
2m1n
mná1
1mo
2moa
moal1
mobi1
mo2ge
m2oi
mo2l
mo2m
mo2n
mon2d
mope1
mopo1
morá1
mori1
mo2ru
mo2sk
2m1p
mpi2
mple1
mp2r
mpu1m
2m1r
2ms
ms2k
m1sko
m1sku
mso2
m1s2t
m1su2
2mš
mš2k
m1ške
m1šo
2m1t
1mu
mu2b
mu2m
muna1
2muš
muta1
2m1v
my1d
2m'
1nab
2nač
1nae
1nag
na2gi
na2gu
1na2h
1nai
1nak
1na2l
na2m
n2a2n
1nanr
2nanv
1nao
2n1ap
1nare
nar1t
1na2s
nasá1
1n2aš
1nati
1natu
n1au
1nav
n1avá
navr1
na2ž
2nažž
1ná
ná2d
ná2me
ná2ni
n1áŋ
n2ár
2n1b
nbea1
2nc
nca2
n1ch
ncha1
nča2
nčča2
2n1d
nda2s
nda2v
nd2oa
2nea
1neah
1neal
1nean
1near
1nec
ne2d
1nee
ne2g
1nega
1neh
nei1d
1nel
ne2li
1nem
1ne2n
1ner
ne2ra
1nes
1neš
1net
2nf1
n1fe1
nfra1
2n1g
n2goa
2n1h
1n2i
ni2bu
ni2d
ni2e
nie1l
nii1
ni1k
nik2r
ni2me
ni2mo
ni1o
nis2t
2niš
nit2t
ni2vi
n2já
njá2g
1n2jea
nje1g
njel1
nj2i
n2joa
2n1k
nká1
2n1l2
2n1m
2n1n
